Tennessee, session 114, HB0947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as "Akilah's Law."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316(q), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(6)
(A) It is an offense to sell, offer to sell, deliver, or transfer a firearm to a
person knowing that the person has been a patient in a mental institution at any
time within the previous five (5) years.
(B) As used in this subdivision (q)(6):
(i) "Mental institution" means any hospital, institution, clinic,
evaluation facility, mental health center, or part thereof, that is used
primarily for the care of persons with mental illness; and
(ii) "Patient in a mental institution" means a person who was
admitted, either voluntarily or involuntarily, to a mental institution unless
the treatment was voluntary and solely for an alcohol abuse disorder and
no other secondary substance abuse disorder or mental illness.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0947
002367
- 1 -